Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5054XS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 2020 Section 1. Section 804.21, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person arrested in obedience to a warrant shall be 3 taken without unnecessary delay before the nearest or most 4 accessible magistrate. The officer shall at the same time 5 deliver to the magistrate the warrant with the officerâs return 6 endorsed on it and subscribed by the officer with the officerâs 7 official title. However, this section , and sections 804.22 8 and 804.23 , do not preclude the release of an arrested person 9 within the period of time the person would otherwise remain 10 incarcerated while waiting to be taken before a magistrate 11 if the release is pursuant to pretrial release guidelines or 12 a bond schedule promulgated by the judicial council, unless 13 the person is charged with manufacture, delivery, possession 14 with intent to manufacture or deliver, or distribution of 15 methamphetamine , or unless the person is charged with a felony 16 and is at the time of the arrest on probation or parole, in 17 lieu of or as a result of a sentence of incarceration imposed 18 upon conviction of a felony, and subject to supervision by the 19 district department of correctional services . If, however, a 20 person is released pursuant to pretrial release guidelines, a 21 magistrate must, within twenty-four hours of the release, or as 22 soon as practicable on the next subsequent working day of the 23 court, either approve in writing of the release, or disapprove 24 of the release and issue a warrant for the personâs arrest. 25 Sec. 2. Section 804.22, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 2. This section and the rules of criminal procedure do 28 not affect the provisions of chapter 805 authorizing the 29 release of a person on citation or bail prior to initial 30 appearance, unless the person is charged with manufacture, 31 delivery, possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, 32 or distribution of methamphetamine , or unless the person is 33 charged with a felony and is at the time of the arrest on 34 probation or parole, in lieu of or as a result of a sentence of 35 -1- LSB 5054XS (4) 91 as/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2020 incarceration imposed upon conviction of a felony, and subject 1 to supervision by the district department of correctional 2 services . The initial appearance of a person so released shall 3 be scheduled for a time not more than thirty days after the 4 date of release. 5